Missouri, session 2026, SB1583.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 67.990 and 67.993, RSMo, are repealed
and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 67.990 and 67.993, to read as follows:
67.990. 1. The governing body of any county or city
not within a county may, upon approval of a majority of the
qualified voters of such county or city voting thereon, levy
and collect a tax not to exceed [five] ten cents per one
hundred dollars of assessed valuation[, or in any county of
the first classification with more than eighty-five thousand
nine hundred but less than eighty-six thousand inhabitants,
the governing body may, upon approval of a majority of the
qualified voters of the county voting thereon, levy and
collect a tax not to exceed ten cents per one hundred
dollars of assessed valuation] upon all taxable property
within the county or city or for the purpose of providing
services to persons sixty years of age or older. The tax so
levied shall be collected along with other county or city
taxes, in the manner provided by law. All funds collected
for this purpose shall be deposited in a special fund for
the provision of services for persons sixty years of age or
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1583 2
older, and shall be used for no other purpose except those
purposes authorized in sections 67.990 to 67.995. Deposits
in the fund shall be expended only upon approval of the
board of directors established in section 67.993, if in a
county, and only in accordance with the fund budget approved
by the county governing body.
2. The question of whether the tax authorized by this
section shall be imposed shall be submitted in substantially
the following form:
OFFICIAL BALLOT
Shall ______ (name of county/city) levy a tax of
______ cents per each one hundred dollars assessed
valuation for the purpose of providing services to
persons sixty years of age or older?
□ YES □ NO
67.993. 1. Upon the approval of the tax authorized by
section 67.990 by the voters of the county or city not
within a county, the tax so approved shall be imposed upon
all taxable property within the county or city and the
proceeds therefrom shall be deposited in a special fund, to
be known as the "Senior Citizens' Services Fund", which is
hereby established within the county or city treasury. No
moneys in the senior citizens' services fund shall be spent
until the board of directors provided for in subsection 2 of
this section has been appointed and has taken office.
2. Upon approval of the tax authorized by section
67.990 by the voters of the county or city, the governing
body of the county or the mayor of the city shall appoint a
board of directors consisting of seven directors, who shall
be selected from the county or city at large and shall, as

SB 1583 3
nearly as practicable, represent the various groups to be
served by the board. Each director shall be a resident of
the county or city. Each director shall be appointed to
serve for a term of four years and until [his] a successor
is duly appointed and qualified; except that, of the
directors first appointed, one director shall be appointed
for a term of one year, two directors shall be appointed for
a term of two years, two directors shall be appointed for a
term of three years, and two directors shall be appointed
for a term of four years. Directors may be reappointed.
All vacancies on the board of directors shall be filled for
the remainder of the unexpired term by the governing body of
the county or mayor of the city. The directors shall not
receive any compensation for their services, but may be
reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses incurred in
the performance of their official duties from the moneys in
the senior citizens' services fund.
3. The administrative control and management of the
funds in the senior citizens' services fund and all programs
to be funded therefrom shall rest solely with the board of
directors appointed under subsection 2 of this section,
except, in counties, the budget for the senior citizens'
services fund shall be approved by the governing body of the
county prior to making of any payments from the fund in any
fiscal year. The board of directors shall use the funds in
the senior citizens' services fund to provide programs which
will improve the health, nutrition, and quality of life of
persons who are sixty years of age or older. The budget may
allocate funds for operational and capital needs to senior-
related programs in the county or city in which such
property taxes are collected. No funds in the senior
citizens' services fund may be used, directly or indirectly,

SB 1583 4
for any political purpose. In providing such services, the
board of directors may contract with any person to provide
services relating, in whole or in part, to the services
which the board itself may provide under this section, and
for such purpose may expend the tax proceeds derived from
the tax authorized by section 67.990.
4. The board of directors shall elect a [chairman]
chair, vice [chairman] chair, and such other officers as it
deems necessary; shall establish eligibility requirements
for the programs it furnishes; and shall do all other things
necessary to carry out the purposes of sections 67.990 to
67.995. A majority of the board of directors shall
constitute a quorum.
5. The board of directors, with the approval of the
governing body of the county or city, may accept any gift of
property or money for the use and benefit of the persons to
be served through the programs established and funded under
sections 67.990 to 67.995 and may sell or exchange any such
property so long as such sale or exchange is in the best
interests of the programs provided under sections 67.990 to
67.995 and the proceeds from such sale or exchange are used
exclusively to fund such programs. For a city not within a
county, the board of directors may solicit, accept, and
expend grants from private or public entities and enter into
agreements to effectuate such grants so long as the
transaction is in the best interest of the programs provided
by the board and the proceeds are used exclusively to fund
such programs.
6. (1) Accreditation attained by a board of directors
established under this section shall be subject to the
following:

SB 1583 5
(a) Such accreditation shall be through a statewide
nonprofit organization dedicated to advancing the well-being
of older adults across the state and specifically supporting
senior citizens' services funding levied in such county;
(b) Such statewide nonprofit organization approving
the program and providing accreditation shall provide a
certificate of completion to each board of directors that
has completed the training program; and
(c) Accreditation shall be renewed on an annual basis.
(2) A board of directors that attains accreditation
under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall pay an annual
fee to such statewide nonprofit organization. Such fee
shall be an amount equal to one percent of the revenues
derived annually from the tax imposed under section 67.990.
(3) The state shall recognize accreditation attained
under subdivision (1) of this subsection as best-practice
training for board members to ensure transparency and proper
administration of the taxpayer moneys collected from the tax
imposed under section 67.990.
(4) A board of directors established after December
31, 2015, shall attain the accreditation described in
100 subdivision (1) of this subsection.
101 (5) A board of directors established before January 1,
102 2016, may attain the accreditation described in subdivision
103 (1) of this subsection.
✓